Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.555

Action by attorney general.

The attorney general may maintain an action to enjoin a foreign entity from doing business in this state in violation of this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1512.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.